Nebraska, session 109, LB1237A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General Fund
for FY2025-26 and (2) $871,419 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Nebraska State Patrol, for Program 630, to aid in carrying out the provisions
of Legislative Bill 1237, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second Session, 2026.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $-0- for FY2025-26 or
$415,990 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. There is hereby appropriated (1) $-0- from the General Fund for
FY2025-26 and (2) $50,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the Department
of Administrative Services, for Program 685, to aid in carrying out the
provisions of Legislative Bill 1237, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, Second
Session, 2026.
No expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems for
state employees shall be made from funds appropriated in this section.
Sec. 3. Laws 2025, LB261, section 15, is amended to read:
Sec. 15. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 122 - Legislative Services
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 12,022,197 12,243,797
CASH FUND 95,000 95,000
FEDERAL FUND est. 39,270 39,270
PROGRAM TOTAL 12,156,467 12,378,067
SALARY LIMIT 10,080,000 10,510,430
There is included in the appropriation to this program for FY2025-26
$75,000 Cash Funds and for FY2026-27 $75,000 Cash Funds from the Nebraska
Health Care Cash Fund for the purpose of ongoing health-related research and
public policy development by the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature. Such funds may be used for, but shall not be limited to, hiring
temporary legal research assistance, consulting and research contracts,
reimbursement for necessary and appropriate expenses incurred in connection
with such research and policy development, and actual and necessary travel
reimbursement for task forces and committees established to conduct health
policy work.
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated. The unexpended General Fund appropriation
balance existing on June 30, 2026, less $921,419, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 4. Original Laws 2025, LB261, section 15, is repealed.
-1-